Utah statutes.
32B-5-404.   Alcohol training and education for off-premise consumption.

(1) (a)  A local authority that issues an off-premise beer retailer license to a business to sell beer at retail for off-premise consumption shall require the following to have a valid record that the individual completed an alcohol training and education seminar in the time periods required by Subsection (1)(b), an individual who:

(i)  directly supervises the sale of beer to a patron for consumption off the premises of the off-premise beer retailer; or

(ii)  sells beer to a patron for consumption off the premises of the off-premise beer retailer.

(b)  If an individual on the date the individual becomes staff to an off-premise beer retailer does not have a valid record that the individual has completed an alcohol training and education seminar for purposes of this part, the individual shall complete an alcohol training and education seminar within 30 days of the day on which the individual becomes staff of an off-premise beer retailer.

(c)  Section 62A-15-401 governs the validity of a record that an individual has completed an alcohol training and education seminar required by this part.

(2)  In accordance with Section 32B-5-403, a local authority may immediately suspend the license of an off-premise beer retailer that allows staff to directly supervise the sale of beer or to sell beer to a patron without having a valid record that the individual completed an alcohol training and education seminar in accordance with Subsection (1).

